Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-251
Permanent school fund; collections on judgments; payable to fund.

All money arising from collections on judgments in favor of the state, shall be transferred and paid into the permanent school fund and become a part thereof.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 36, p. 315;

R.S.1913, § 5873;

C.S.1922, § 5208;

C.S.1929, § 72-228;

R.S.1943, § 72-251.